Utah statutes.
76-3-301.   Fines of persons.

(1)  A person convicted of an offense may be sentenced to pay a fine, not exceeding:

(a)  $10,000 for a felony conviction of the first degree or second degree;

(b)  $5,000 for a felony conviction of the third degree;

(c)  $2,500 for a class A misdemeanor conviction;

(d)  $1,000 for a class B misdemeanor conviction;

(e)  $750 for a class C misdemeanor conviction or infraction conviction; and

(f)  any greater amounts specifically authorized by statute.

(2)  This section does not apply to a corporation, association, partnership, government, or governmental instrumentality.

